Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.080

Substance use disorder certification advisory committee—Composition—Terms.

(1) The secretary shall appoint a substance use disorder certification advisory committee to further the purposes of this chapter. The committee shall be composed of seven members, one member initially appointed for a term of one year, three for a term of two years, and three for a term of three years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of three years. No person may serve as a member of the committee for more than two consecutive terms. Members of the committee shall be residents of this state. The committee shall be composed of four certified substance use disorder professionals; one substance use disorder treatment program director; one physician licensed under chapter 18.71 or 18.57 RCW who is certified in addiction medicine or a licensed or certified mental health practitioner; and one member of the public who has received substance use disorder counseling.

(2) The secretary may remove any member of the committee for cause as specified by rule. In the case of a vacancy, the secretary shall appoint a person to serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.

(3) The committee shall meet at the times and places designated by the secretary and shall hold meetings during the year as necessary to provide advice to the director. The committee may elect a chair and a vice chair. A majority of the members currently serving shall constitute a quorum.

(4) Each member of the committee shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as authorized in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. In addition, members of the committee shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.240 when engaged in the authorized business of the committee.

(5) The director of the health care authority, or his or her designee, shall serve as an ex officio member of the committee.

(6) The secretary, members of the committee, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any certification or disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 2019 c 444 s 4; 2018 c 201 s 9007; 1998 c 243 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 201: See notes following RCW 41.05.018.